Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-402
Nebraska Library Commission; expenses; payment.

The members of the Nebraska Library Commission shall serve without pay. They shall receive remuneration for traveling and actual expenses incurred while engaged in the business of the commission as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177 for state employees. These expenses shall be paid out of the funds of the Nebraska Library Commission.

Laws 1935, c. 115, § 2, p. 370;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 51-502;

R.S.1943, § 51-402;

Laws 1972, LB 1033, § 5;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 93.